Utah statutes.
77-40-111.   Rulemaking.

The department may make rules to:

(1)  implement procedures for applying for certificates of eligibility;

(2)  specify procedures for receiving a certificate of eligibility; and

(3)  create forms and determine information necessary to be provided to the bureau.



Enacted by Chapter 283, 2010 General Session

